Nevada, session 83, SB393.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Section 8 of the Windsor Park Environmental
Justice Act, being chapter 531, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page
3540, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 8. “Windsor Park neighborhood” means the area of
the City lying north of West Cartier Avenue, west of Clayton
Street, east of Chamberlain Lane, and south of West Evans
Avenue. The area includes single-family residences and
vacant lots on the south side of West Cartier Avenue and
otherwise within the area defined in this section. The area
also includes single-family residences and vacant lots west
of Chamberlain Lane and on West Cartier Avenue, Sommer
Court, Hayworth Avenue or Stanton Drive.
Sec. 2. Section 9 of the Windsor Park Environmental Justice
Act, being chapter 531, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 3540, is
hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 9. 1. The Housing Division shall establish and
administer a program pursuant to which the owner of [a] :
(a) A single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood who owns that residence on [July 1,]
December 31, 2023, may exchange that single-family
residence for another single-family residence constructed in
accordance with this section.
(b) A vacant lot in the Windsor Park neighborhood who
owned a single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood that was formerly located on that vacant lot,
or the descendant of such an owner, and who owns that
vacant lot on December 31, 2023, may exchange that vacant
lot for another vacant lot in an area as near as reasonably
practicable to the Windsor Park neighborhood in
accordance with this section. The owner or descendant of
such an owner must be offered the opportunity to exchange
a vacant lot in Windsor Park for a vacant lot that is located
in the Cibola Park area of the City and that is available to
be exchanged in accordance with any agreements between
the City, Clark County and the Housing Division, before
being offered any other vacant lot.
2. For the purposes of the program established
pursuant to this section, a person may establish that he or
she is the owner of a single-family residence or a vacant lot
in the Windsor Park neighborhood on December 31, 2023,
by:
-
*SB393_R3*

– 4 –
(a) Executing an affidavit, under penalty of perjury, that
he or she acquired title to the single-family residence or
vacant lot from a deceased relative by operation of law; and
(b) Presenting to the Housing Division, or the
governmental agency, nonprofit corporation or other entity
selected by the Housing Division pursuant to subsection 3,
any of the following evidence of ownership:
(1) An original deed, deed of trust, bill of sale or land
installment contract;
(2) A current property tax bill and proof of payment
of property taxes for the immediately preceding 15 years;
(3) A certified copy of a will naming the applicant as
heir to the property along with a death certificate or other
evidence that the applicant is the heir to the property and
documentation establishing that the applicant has been
residing in the single-family residence or has acted as the
owner of the vacant lot for the immediately preceding 15
years, including, without limitation, property tax bills or
utility bills; or
(4) Any other evidence indicating intent to own the
single-family residence or vacant land on or before
December 31, 2023, if the applicant was unable to acquire
ownership on or before December 31, 2023.
[2.] 3. The Housing Division shall apply for any
available grants of money from the Federal Government to
carry out the provisions of sections 1 to 9.7, inclusive, of this
act and shall select a governmental agency, nonprofit
corporation or other entity engaged in the development of
affordable housing to develop single-family residences on
vacant land [adjacent] in areas as near as reasonably
practicable to the Windsor Park neighborhood. The
governmental agency, nonprofit corporation or other entity
selected by the Housing Division pursuant to this subsection
shall, in accordance with a financing agreement entered into
pursuant to subsection [5,] 6, contract with qualified
professionals for a study of vacant land adjacent to the
Windsor Park neighborhood that could be acquired to ensure
that such land will not subside, acquire vacant land adjacent
to the Windsor Park neighborhood if the study finds that such
land will not subside and enter into contracts to develop and
construct single-family residences on that land. In awarding
such contracts, a preference with a relative weight of 5
percent must be assigned to an applicant that is a business in
which at least 50 percent of the interest is owned by a resident
or former resident of the Windsor Park neighborhood. Any
-
*SB393_R3*

– 5 –
restriction on the price which the Housing Division may pay
to acquire a parcel of real property does not apply to an
acquisition pursuant to this section.
[3.] 4. The number of single-family residences
constructed pursuant to this section must be sufficient in
number to enable each [household residing in] owner of a
single-family residence in the Windsor Park neighborhood on
[July 1,] December 31, 2023, to obtain such a single-family
residence, and the single-family residences constructed
pursuant to this section must enable [a household residing in]
an owner of a single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood on [July 1,] December 31, 2023, to obtain a
single-family residence with at least the same amount of
square footage as the residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood. The number of vacant lots acquired pursuant
to this section must be sufficient in number and size to
enable each owner described in paragraph (b) of subsection
1 of a vacant lot in the Windsor Park neighborhood who
owned a vacant lot in the Windsor Park neighborhood on
December 31, 2023, to exchange the vacant lot in the
Windsor Park neighborhood for a vacant lot with at least
the same number of acres as the vacant lot in the Windsor
Park neighborhood.
[4.] 5. The City shall grant the employees and
representatives of the governmental entity, nonprofit
corporation or other entity selected by the Housing Division,
and the Housing Division, access to any right-of-way owned
or controlled by the City and access to any lots owned by the
City within the Windsor Park neighborhood when such access
is necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, and the
City shall not unreasonably withhold such access.
[5.] 6. The governmental entity, nonprofit corporation
or other entity selected by the Housing Division pursuant to
subsection [2,] 3, the City and the Housing Division shall
enter into an agreement to finance the development and
construction of single-family residences pursuant to this
section. The agreement must require:
(a) The use of money appropriated or authorized by the
Legislature to the Housing Division for the purposes set forth
in this section.
(b) Any other money from any public or private source,
including, without limitation, any gift, grant, appropriation or
contribution, available to be used for the purposes set forth in
this section.
-
*SB393_R3*

– 6 –
[6.] 7. Upon the issuance of a certificate of occupancy
for each single-family residence constructed pursuant to this
section, the owner of a single-family residence in the Windsor
Park neighborhood who owns that residence on [July 1,]
December 31, 2023, may exchange that single-family
residence for a single-family residence which was constructed
pursuant to this section and which has at least the same
amount of square footage as the residence being exchanged.
If the single-family residence being exchanged is:
(a) Encumbered by a mortgage or deed of trust, the
single-family residence may not be exchanged unless the
existing mortgage or deed of trust is paid in full. The Housing
Division shall provide assistance to arrange any financing
necessary to pay off the existing mortgage or deed of trust,
including, without limitation, any down payment assistance
available under any program administered by the Housing
Division. The amount of the existing mortgage or deed of
trust paid off through any assistance provided by the
Housing Division pursuant to this paragraph must not
exceed the pay off amount as of May 25, 2025.
(b) Leased to a tenant occupying the single-family
residence under a lease agreement, the lease agreement
remains in effect with the same terms and conditions.
 [Any] The Housing Division shall file for record a
certificate in the office of the county recorder which states
the amount of the mortgage or deed of trust paid off
pursuant to this subsection. From the time of the filing of
the certificate, the amount of the mortgage or deed of trust
paid off pursuant to this subsection constitutes a lien upon
the single-family residence acquired pursuant to this
subsection [may not be sold for a period of] for the amount
of the mortgage or deed of trust paid off pursuant to this
subsection. A lien under this subsection is prior to all other
liens and encumbrances on the unit except liens for taxes
and other governmental assessments, charges or liens
against the single-family residence and the first mortgage or
deed of trust on the single-family residence acquired
pursuant to this subsection. The lien expires 5 years [after
the single-family residence is acquired, except that such a
single-family residence may be transferred in a transaction
that is exempt from the taxes imposed by chapter 375 of NRS
pursuant to NRS 375.090.
7.] after the time of the filing of the certificate.
8. Until July 1, 2057, a single-family residence
acquired pursuant to subsection 7 is entitled to an
-
*SB393_R3*

– 7 –
exemption from property taxes that is equal to the difference
between the taxes levied on the single-family residence that
was acquired pursuant to subsection 7, as determined
pursuant to NRS 361.225 and 361.227, on the date on which
that single-family residence was acquired, and the taxes
levied on the single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood that was exchanged, as determined pursuant
to NRS 361.225 and 361.227, for the fiscal year in which
the single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood was exchanged. The provisions of NRS
361.4722, 361.4723 and 361.4724 apply to the calculation of
the taxes on the single-family residence levied on the single-
family residence acquired pursuant to subsection 7.
9. The taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 375 of NRS
do not apply to any transfer of property pursuant to the
provisions of this Act by the governmental agency, nonprofit
corporation or other entity that has entered into an
agreement pursuant to subsection 6, or an affiliate of such
an entity, or a transfer of property pursuant to the provision
of this Act to or from a resident of the Windsor Park
neighborhood, or the owner of a vacant lot in the Windsor
Park neighborhood, who is exchanging a single-family
residence or a vacant lot pursuant to this Act.
10. The power, sewer and other connection fees imposed
by the City on a single-family residence in the Windsor Park
neighborhood must be transferred to a single-family residence
acquired pursuant to this section as the power, sewer and the
connections fees to be imposed on that single-family
residence.
[8.] 11. Any property in the Windsor Park
neighborhood that is exchanged pursuant to this section must
be used only for the purposes of a public park to memorialize
the past and present residents of the Windsor Park
neighborhood [.] , which must be available for use, without
charge, to schools and churches that serve the Windsor
Park neighborhood. For the purposes of creating such a
public park, the governmental agency, nonprofit
corporation or other entity selected by the Housing Division
pursuant to subsection 3 must be engaged under an
agreement, which must be separate from any agreement
entered into pursuant to subsection 6, for any additional
work necessary to develop and construct such a park,
including, without limitation, the demolition of any
residences transferred pursuant to this section. Any
agreement for the demolition of the residences pursuant to
-
*SB393_R3*

– 8 –
this subsection is exempt from the provisions of state law
governing the award of a contract by governmental entities,
and any payments pursuant to such an agreement must be
paid entirely from money appropriated by the Legislature
for that purpose. After the demolition of the residences
pursuant to this subsection, the City shall maintain the
property as a public park for the purposes described in this
subsection.
Sec. 3. Section 9.3 of the Windsor Park Environmental Justice
Act, being chapter 531, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 3542, is
hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 9.3. 1. The Housing Division shall establish a
program to pay:
(a) The [moving] relocation expenses of [and restitution
to] the owners of single-family residences in the Windsor
Park neighborhood [in the manner set forth in this section.]
who acquire a single-family residence pursuant to section 9
of this act and who move from the Windsor Park
neighborhood to the acquired single-family residence.
(b) The cost of the rehabilitation of the homes constructed
with money received by the City from Community
Development Block Grants for the purpose of rehabilitating
homes in the Windsor Park neighborhood [.] in an amount
not to exceed $10,000 per single-family residence.
2. The City shall transfer to the Housing Division:
(a) Any remaining proceeds of general obligation bonds
issued by the City and purchased by the Federal National
Mortgage Association for the purpose of relocating residents
of the Windsor Park neighborhood [.] , and any remaining
interest on those proceeds.
(b) Any money remaining from Community Development
Block Grants awarded to the City for the purpose of
relocating residents in the Windsor Park neighborhood.
(c) Any money remaining from Community Development
Block Grants awarded to the City for the purpose of
constructing residences for the residents of the Windsor Park
neighborhood.
 Any money received pursuant to this subsection must be
accounted for separately and may be used only to carry out
the provisions of this section.
3. From amounts transferred to the Housing Division
pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 2, the
Housing Division shall [:
(a) Pay restitution in the amount of $50,000 to the owner
of a single-family residence in the Windsor Park
-
*SB393_R3*

– 9 –
neighborhood who resides in the neighborhood on July 1,
2023, and who was the initial occupant of that single-family
residence, or to the descendants of that owner who inherited
the single-family residence from the initial occupant and who
reside in the single-family residence on July 1, 2023.
(b) Pay restitution in the amount of $10,000 to the person
who was the initial occupant of a single-family residence in
the Windsor Park neighborhood, or to the descendants of that
person who inherited the single-family residence from the
initial occupant.
(c) Pay] pay the actual [moving] relocation expenses , as
defined by federal guidelines for the use of Community
Development Block Grant funds, in an amount not to
exceed $50,000, of a person who owns a single-family
residence in the Windsor Park neighborhood on
December 31, 2023, who acquires a single-family residence
pursuant to section 9 of this act and who moves from the
Windsor Park neighborhood to that acquired single-family
residence.
[4. From the amount transferred to the Housing Division
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 2, the Housing
Division shall pay, in an amount not to exceed $10,000 per
single-family residence, the cost of rehabilitating a single-
family residence constructed for a resident of the Windsor
Park neighborhood using money received by the City from a
Community Development Block Grant. The governmental
entity, nonprofit corporation or other entity selected by the
Housing Division pursuant to subsection 2 of section 9 of this
act shall inspect the single-family residence to determine
whether or not the rehabilitation has been satisfactorily
completed.
5.] Such relocation expenses may be paid to a person
who was the tenant of an owner of a single-family residence
in the Windsor Park neighborhood on December 31, 2023,
and who is required to move residences as a result of the
program established pursuant to section 9 of this act. Any
relocation expenses must be paid in advance directly to the
owner or tenant incurring the expenses based on
documentation establishing the actual amount of the
expenses. To the extent that money transferred to the Housing
Division pursuant to subsection 2 is insufficient to make the
entire amount of the payments required by subsection 1 or 3 ,
[or 4,] the Housing Division shall reduce such payments on a
pro rata basis.
-
*SB393_R3*

– 10 –
Sec. 4. Section 11 of chapter 531, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at
page 3543, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 11. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the
State General Fund to the Housing Division of the
Department of Business and Industry the sum of $12,000,000
for the purposes set forth in sections 1 to 9.7, inclusive, of
this act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after
June 30, [2025,] 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any
manner, and any portion of the appropriated money
remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September [19, 2025,] 17, 2027, by either the entity to which
the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September [19, 2025.] 17, 2027.
Sec. 4.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Housing Division of the Department of
Business and Industry the sum of $26,000,000 for the purposes set
forth in the Windsor Park Environmental Justice Act, being chapter
531, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 3538, and the provisions of
sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 5. 1. This section and sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this
act become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 4.5 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB393_R3*